Missouri, session 2026, SB1113.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1260, to read as
follows:
376.1260. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Cost-sharing requirement", any deductible,
coinsurance, co-payment, or maximum limitation on the
application of such deductible, coinsurance, co-payment, or
similar out-of-pocket expense;
(2) "Genetic counseling", the provision of services to
individuals, couples, families, and organizations by one or
more appropriately trained individuals to address the
physical and psychological issues associated with the
occurrence or risk of occurrence of a genetic disorder,
birth defect, or genetically influenced condition or disease
in an individual or a family;
(3) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning as is
ascribed to such term in section 376.1350;
(4) "Health carrier", the same meaning as is ascribed
to such term in section 376.1350.

SB 1113 2
2. Each health benefit plan delivered, issued for
delivery, continued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027,
shall provide coverage for genetic counseling and genetic
testing provided by an individual certified by an
accrediting body, recognized by the department of commerce
and insurance, to provide genetic counseling and genetic
testing. The coverage required under this section shall
include all costs associated with genetic counseling and, if
indicated after genetic counseling, a genetic laboratory
test of genes for individuals assessed to be at an increased
risk, based on a clinical risk assessment tool, of
potentially harmful mutations in genes due to a personal or
family history of cancer.
3. No health benefit plan or health carrier shall
consider, or request approval to consider, the results of
any genetic testing or the provision of genetic counseling
provided in accordance with this section in determining
eligibility for coverage, establishing premiums, limiting
coverage, renewing coverage, or any other underwriting
decision. A violation of this subsection shall constitute a
violation of section 375.1303.
4. No health benefit plan shall impose any cost-
sharing requirement with respect to coverage required under
this section. If application of this section would result
in health savings account ineligibility under Section 223 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, this section
shall apply to health savings account-qualified high
deductible health plans with respect to any cost-sharing
under the plans only after an enrollee has satisfied the
minimum deductible under Section 223, except with respect to
items or services that are preventive care under Section
223(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as

SB 1113 3
amended, in which case the requirements of this section
shall apply regardless of whether the minimum deductible
under Section 223 has been satisfied.
✓